Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.256

Rights of judgment creditor.

(1) On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a member or transferee, the court may charge the transferable interest of the judgment debtor with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of a transferee. The court may appoint a receiver of the share of the distributions due or to become due to the judgment creditor in respect of the limited liability company and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries the judgment debtor might have made or that the circumstances of the case may require to give effect to the charging order.

(2) A charging order constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor's transferable interest. The court may order a foreclosure upon the transferable interest subject to the charging order at any time. The purchaser at the foreclosure sale has the rights of a transferee.

(3) At any time before foreclosure, a transferable interest charged may be redeemed:

(a) By the judgment debtor;

(b) With property other than limited liability company property, by one or more of the other members; or

(c) With limited liability company property, by the limited liability company with the consent of all members whose interests are not so charged.

(4) This chapter does not deprive any member or transferee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the member's or transferee's transferable interest.

(5) This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a judgment creditor of a member or transferee may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor's transferable interest.

[ 2015 c 188 s 50.]